North Dakota, session 69, SB2202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 4.1-03-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
4.1-03-01. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
1. "Beef producer" means any person that has an ownership interest in cattle.
2. "Cattle" means live domesticated bovine animals.
3. "Cattle feeder" means a person in the business of feeding cattle for the purpose of
adding weight to the cattle prior to slaughter.
4. "Cattle industry representative" means an individual who is or has been a beef
producer, cattle feeder, dairy producer, or representative of a public livestock market in
the state.
5. "Commission" means the North Dakota beef commission.
5.6. "Dairy producer" means any person in the business of producing and selling milk from
cows.
6.7. "Director" means the director of the North Dakota state university extension service.
Page No. 1 25.0782.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
8. "Eligible voter" means a beef producer who is at least eighteen years of age.
9. "Livestock auction market" means a public market or private buying station in which
livestock is offered for sale or sold.
7.10. "Livestock dealer" means a person that purchases cattle and is required to be licensed
under chapter 36-04 4.1 - 83 .
8.11. "Participating producer" means a beef producer that has not obtained a refund of any
assessment paid on the sale of cattle under this chapter for the preceding three
yearsyear.
12. "Public livestock market" means a livestock auction market, public market, or private
buying station in which livestock is offered for sale, auctioned, or sold and is required
to be licensed under chapter 4.1 - 27 or 4.1 - 28 .
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 4.1-03-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
4.1-03-02. North Dakota beef commission - Membership - Qualifications.
1. The North Dakota beef commission consists of:
a. Three beef producers;
b. One cattle feeder;
c. One dairy producer;
d. One representative of a public livestock market; and
e. Three at-large representatives.
2. The governor shall appoint:
a. Each beef producer from a list of at least two names submitted by the North
Dakota stockmen's association;
b. The cattle feeder from a list of at least two names submitted by the North Dakota
stockmen's association feeder council;
c. The dairy producer from a list of at least two names submitted by the milk
producers association of North Dakota;
d. The representative of a public livestock market from a list of at least two names
submitted by the North Dakota livestock marketing association; and
e. The three at-large representatives.
Page No. 2 25.0782.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
3. a. The commission consists of one cattle industry representative elected from each
of the districts under section 5 of this Act. The chairman, vice chairman, and
secretary-treasurer of the commission, serving on December 31, 2025, may
continue to serve in their respective positions as provided under section
4.1 - 03 - 03 .
2. Each member of the commission must:
(1)a. Be a United States citizen and a resident of this state;
(2)b. Physically reside in the district the member represents; and
c. Be an actively engaged in that phase of the cattle industry the member
represents; and
(3) Have been actively engaged in that phase of the cattle industry for a period
of five yearsrepresentative.
b.3. Each member of the commission, exceptunless the member is a representative of a
public livestock market, must be a participating producer.
c.4. For purposes of this subsection, "actively engaged" means that the individual:
(1)a. Has an ownership interest in ana cattle operation that isqualifies the individual as
a cattle industry representative;
b. Is engaged in an activity of sufficient scope and significance as to constitute a
distinct activity; and
(2)c. Has and regularly exercisesexercised direct control of the cattle operation for the
preceding year.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 4.1-03-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
4.1-03-03. Term of office.
1. TheExcept as otherwise provided in this section, the term of office for each member is
three years and begins on JulyJanuary first. The terms must be staggered so that no
more than three terms expire each year.
2. The terms of all commission members, except the members serving as chairman, vice
chairman, and secretary-treasurer of the commission on December 31, 2025, expire
on December 31, 2025 .
Page No. 3 25.0782.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
a. The chairman of the commission, serving on December 31, 2025, shall represen t
district six, as described under section 5 of this Act, until December 31, 2027 .
b. The vice chairman of the commission, serving on December 31, 2025, shal l
represent district one, as described under section 5 of this Act, unti l
December 31, 2028 .
c. The secretary-treasurer of the commission, serving on December 31, 2025, shal l
represent district nine, as described under section 5 of this Act, unti l
December 31, 2026 .
d. The chairman, vice chairman, and secretary-treasurer of the commission, serving
on December 31, 2025, each serving their respective term under this subsection ,
have the same rights, duties, and privileges as elected commission members.
3. Between October 1, 2025, and December 31, 2025, districts two, three, four, five ,
seven, and eight, as described under section 5 of this Act, each shall elect a
commission member with a term, beginning January 1, 2026. The initial terms o f
individuals elected to begin serving as commission members on January 1, 2026, are :
a. One year for commission members representing districts two and five;
b. Two years for commission members representing districts three and seven; and
c. Three years for commission members representing districts four and eight.
4. Between October first and December thirty - first of the calendar year in which a
commission member's term is to expire, the respective district shall elect an individual
to serve as a commission member to represent that district for the succeeding term.
5. A member of the commission may not serve more than two consecutive terms. If an
individual is appointed after August 1, 2009, to complete a vacancy, thatThe service is
not counted as aof the initial term, for purposes of this section, unless the duration of
that service exceeds one year under subdivision a of subsection 3 for commission
members of districts two and five is not counted for purposes of this subsection.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 4.1-03-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
4.1-03-04. Vacancy.
If a member's office is vacant, the position must be filled, for the remainder of the term, in
the same manner as the original appointment. A member's office is vacant if:
Page No. 4 25.0782.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
1. At any time during a member's term the member ceases to possess any of the
qualifications provided for in this chapter;
2. Any event enumerated in section 44-02-01 occurs; or
3. The commission determines that a member has failed to attend three consecutive
meetings of the commission without justificationa commission member fails to meet the
qualifications required to serve as a commission member under this chapter or a vacancy under
section 44 - 02 - 01 occurs, the commission, by majority vote, shall appoint a qualified cattle
industry representative for the remainder of the term. If an individual is appointed by the
commission to complete a vacancy, that service is not counted as years of service under
section 3 of this Act, unless the duration of that service exceeds one year. An individua l
appointed under this section has the same rights, duties, and privileges as an elected
commission member.
SECTION 5. A new section to chapter 4.1-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Geographical districts - Redistricting - Report to legislative assembly .
1. The state consists of the following districts:
a. District one: Barnes, Cass, Cavalier, Eddy, Foster, Grand Forks, Griggs, Nelson,
Pembina, Ramsey, Steele, Towner, Traill, and Walsh Counties;
b. District two: Dickey, LaMoure, McIntosh, Ransom, Richland, and Sargent
Counties;
c. District three: Kidder, Logan, and Stutsman Counties;
d. District four: Burleigh, Emmons, Sheridan, and Wells Counties;
e. District five: Benson, Bottineau, McHenry, Pierce, Renville, and Rolette Counties;
f. District six: Burke, Divide, McKenzie, McLean, Mountrail, Ward, and Williams
Counties;
g. District seven: Billings, Dunn, Golden Valley, Oliver, and Mercer Counties;
h. District eight: Adams, Bowman, Hettinger, Slope, and Stark Counties; and
i. District nine: Grant, Morton, and Sioux Counties.
2. The commission shall review the nine district boundaries and tally the number of cattle
in each district at least once every seven years to ensure accurate producer
representation. If the commission determines the nine districts do not accurately
Page No. 5 25.0782.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
represent cattle industry representatives in the state, the commission may enact a
redistricting plan to amend district boundaries, provided each district contains at least
three undivided counties. If two - thirds of the elected commission members vote in
favor of the proposed redistricting plan, the commission shall adopt the plan. If the
commission adopts a redistricting plan, the commission shall report to the next
legislative assembly to propose an amendment to subsection 1 in a manner consisten t
with the results of the redistricting plan. The redistricting plan becomes effective on the
date the amended district boundaries under subsection 1 become effective .
SECTION 6. A new section to chapter 4.1-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Director of the North Dakota state university extension service - Nomination and
election of district commission candidates.
1. a. The director of the North Dakota state university extension service shall oversee
district representative commission member nominations and elections.
b. Between October first and November fifteenth of each year, the director shall
conduct the nominating and election process to elect successors for districts with
terms expiring that fiscal year.
c. The director shall notify all known cattle industry representatives in the respective
district and request nominations for district representative commission candidates
no fewer than forty-five days before the district representative commission
election. The notice must include the date, time, and place of the election and
must be published in all official county newspapers within the district or by
reliable electronic means.
d. To be eligible as a candidate in a district commission election, at least five cattle
industry representatives who reside in the district shall nominate the candidate in
writing. A cattle industry representative may not self-nominate.
e. Upon receiving the district commission nominations, the director shall certify that
nominated candidates meet the requirements of section 4.1 - 03 - 02. The director
shall prepare the election ballots with the names of the certified nominated district
commission candidates. Voting must occur within a period of five business days
set by the director. Each ballot also must include a statement indicating:
Page No. 6 25.0782.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(1) The date, time, and location the director will open the ballots and tabulate
the results; and
(2) Any cattle industry representative in the district may be present at the time
the ballots are opened and tabulated.
f. The director and the executive director of the commission shall hold the district
commission election by paper ballot. An eligible voter shall go to the North
Dakota state university extension service location within the voter's district to cast
the ballot.
g. The director and the executive director of the commission shall canvass the
votes. The director shall notify the commission and the governor that the election
has taken place, and provide to the commission and the governor the name and
address and term of the newly elected district representative commission
member.
2. If the cattle industry representatives in a district fail to elect an individual, as required
by this section, the director shall notify the commission and the governor. The
governor shall appoint a cattle industry representative who meets the requirements of
section 4.1 - 03 - 02 to serve as the district commission member for the district. An
individual appointed under this subsection has the same rights, duties, and privileges
as an elected commission member.
3. Each eligible voter is entitled to one vote and must vote in the district in which the
voter's livestock operation headquarters is located. If an eligible voter has multiple
livestock operation headquarters in more than one district, the eligible voter shall cast
their vote in the district in which the voter physically resides. Before casting a vote, the
voter shall certify on the ballot the voter is an eligible voter as provided under section
4.1 - 03 - 01 .
4. To verify the eligibility certification made under subsection 3, the commission may
request proof of an individual's eligibility, such as an eligible sales receipt.
SECTION 7. A new section to chapter 4.1-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Page No. 7 25.0782.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
Election costs - Responsibility.
All costs of holding district commission member nominations and elections under section 6
of this Act are the responsibility of the commission.
SECTION 8. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 2 of this Act becomes effective on January 1,
2026.
Page No. 8 25.0782.02000